Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
HOMEOWNERS INSURANCE CLAIMS HISTORY

[§431:10E-121] Purpose. The
purpose of this part is to regulate the use of claims history information for
homeowners insurance and provide certain consumer protections with respect to
the use of this information. [L 2012, c 80 pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next